Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201358-862
Nebraska Health Education Loan Repayment Fund; created; use.

There is hereby created a separate fund, to be known as the
Nebraska Health Education Loan Repayment Fund, which shall consist of all
revenue generated in connection with loans funded pursuant to the Nebraska
Educational, Health, and Social
Services Finance Authority Act. The authority may pledge revenue
received or to be received by the fund to secure bonds, notes, or other obligations
issued pursuant to the act. The authority may create such subfunds or accounts
within the fund as it deems necessary or advisable.

Laws 1983, LB 159, § 12;

Laws 1993, LB 465, § 33;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2959;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 59;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1759;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 62.
September 6, 2013